North Dakota, session 69, SB2391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Stutsman county road 62 - State highway system.
The director shall designate Stutsman county road 62 from the junction of state highway 46
to the junction of interstate highway 94 as a part of the state highway system .
Page No. 1 25.1316.01000